Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HIV/AIDS SUPPORT SERVICES.new text end new text begin $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to community-based HIV/AIDS support services providers. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. The base for this appropriation is $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2028. new text end